Maryland, session 2026, HB1397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–331.
WHEN CALCULATING A SCHOOL’S GROSS AREA BASELINE, THE
INTERAGENCY COMMISSION SHALL ALLOCATE SQUARE FOOTAGE TO
ACCOMMODATE AQUATIC FACILITIES FOR ATHLETIC EDUCATION AND COMPETITIVE
PURPOSES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Before the 2026–2027 school year begins, each local school system shall
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1397*

HOUSE BILL 1397
develop a facilities plan that identifies options for students to have access to a pool or
aquatic facilities.
(b) The Interagency Commission on School Construction shall collaborate with
each local school system to develop the plan under subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.